District of Columbia statutes.
38-1963

Repealed

Salary schedule.

Repealed.

Aug. 5, 1955, 69 Stat. 521, ch. 569, title I, § 1
July 25, 1958, 72 Stat. 414, Pub. L. 85-552, § 1
Aug. 28, 1958, 72 Stat. 1004, Pub. L. 85-838,§ 1
Sept. 13, 1960, 74 Stat. 913, Pub. L. 87-773, § 1
Oct. 24, 1962, 76 Stat. 1229, Pub. L. 87-881, title I, § 101(1)
Aug. 14, 1964, 78 Stat. 431, Pub. L. 88-426, title III, § 306(i)(5)
Sept. 2, 1964, 78 Stat. 882, Pub. L. 88-575, title II, § 201(1)
Nov. 13, 1966, 80 Stat. 1594, Pub. L. 89-810, title II, § 202(1)
May 27, 1968, 82 Stat. 132, Pub. L. 90-319,§ 2(1)
May 27, 1968, 82 Stat. 135, Pub. L. 90-319, § 2(2)
June 30, 1970, 84 Stat. 358, Pub. L. 91-297, title III, § 302(1)
Oct. 21, 1972, 86 Stat. 1005, Pub. L. 92-518, title I, § 102(a)
Sept. 3, 1974, 88 Stat. 1042, Pub. L. 93-407, title II, § 202(1), (2)
Jan. 3, 1975, 88 Stat. 2175, Pub. L. 93-635, §§ 4, 5
Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-90, § 2(1), (2), 23 DCR 9532b
May 18, 1977, D.C. Law 2-1, § 2(a), 23 DCR 9698
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-78, § 11, 29 DCR 49
1981 Ed., § 31-1101.
1973 Ed., § 31-1501.